Nevada, session 83, AB574.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $57,742
for the High Desert State Prison budget account for the purchase of
security and safety equipment.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $80,981
for the High Desert State Prison budget account for the replacement
of automotive equipment.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $36,345
for the High Desert State Prison budget account for the replacement
of culinary equipment.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the High Desert
State Prison budget account for the replacement of security
equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $62,708
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $23,289
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the High Desert
State Prison budget account for the replacement of warehouse and
culinary equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $495,706
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $1,965
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 6. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the High Desert
State Prison budget account for the replacement of medical
equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $20,410
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $20,410
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 7. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the High Desert
State Prison budget account for the replacement of laundry
equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,083,520
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $19,992
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 8. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the High Desert
State Prison budget account for the replacement of office furniture
and visiting room chairs the following sums:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $71,840
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $5,200
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 9. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the High Desert
State Prison budget account for smaller equipment purchases the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $13,870
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $13,870
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 10. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)